Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Alaska Hospital and Medical Facilities Survey and Construction Act.

Collateral references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Hospitals and Asylums, §§ 4 — 6.

41 C.J.S., Hospitals, § 5.

Sec. 18.20.140.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

18.20.140

—

18.20.220

is to make an inventory of existing hospitals and medical facilities, community mental health centers, and facilities for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities; to survey the need for construction of hospitals and medical facilities, community mental health centers, and facilities for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities; and to develop a program and plan of construction for each.

History.

(§ 2 ch 87 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 1964; am § 6 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Sec. 18.20.141.
Department functions.

The department shall be the sole agency for the administration of the plan as required by the federal act.
The department shall develop and administer any programs necessary for compliance with the federal act.

History.

(§ 4 ch 63 SLA 1964)

Sec. 18.20.150.
Duties of department.

For each of the following groups of facilities, hospitals and medical facilities (Group 1), community mental health centers (Group 2), and facilities for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities (Group 3), the department shall

make a statewide inventory of existing public, nonprofit, and proprietary facilities;

survey the need for construction of these facilities;

on the basis of the inventory and survey, develop a program for the construction of public and other nonprofit facilities for each of these groups that will, in conjunction with existing facilities, afford the necessary physical facilities for furnishing adequate facility services to all residents of the state.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998.]

The department shall

provide for adequate facilities to furnish needed services for persons unable to pay for them in accordance with regulations adopted under the federal act;

submit any reports that the surgeon general considers necessary for compliance with the federal act;

do all things on behalf of the state necessary to obtain benefits under the federal act.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1964; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized into subsections in 1986.

Collateral references. —

Validity and construction of statute requiring establishment of “need” as precondition to operation of hospital or other facilities for the care of sick people. 61 ALR3d 278.

Sec. 18.20.160.
Priority of projects.

The state plan must set out the relative need for the projects included in the construction program determined in accordance with the regulations adopted under the federal act, and provide for the construction, maintenance, and operation to the extent financial resources permit, in the order of the relative need.

History.

(§ 5 ch 87 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.20.170.
Application for construction projects.

The state, a political subdivision of the state, or a public or other nonprofit agency requesting federal funds for a health facility construction project must apply to the department.
The application must conform to federal and state requirements.

History.

(§ 6 ch 87 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 1964)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The expenditure of state money in the construction of a hospital operated by a religious nonprofit group under the terms and conditions imposed by the federal government under the Hill-Burton Act is a public purpose and not prohibited by the constitution or laws of the state. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 19.

Sec. 18.20.180.
Approval of applications.

The commissioner of the department shall give every applicant an opportunity for a fair hearing.
If, after giving reasonable opportunity for development and presentation of applications in the order of relative need, the commissioner of the department finds that a project application complies with the requirements of AS

18.20.170

and conforms with the state plan, the commissioner shall approve and recommend the application and forward it to the surgeon general.

History.

(§ 7 ch 87 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.20.190.
Inspection of projects.

The commissioner of the department shall inspect each construction project approved by the surgeon general from time to time.
If the commissioner finds that work has been performed upon the project or purchases have been made in accordance with the approved plans and specifications, the commissioner shall certify to the surgeon general that this is the fact and that payment of an installment of federal funds is due the applicant.

History.

(§ 8 ch 87 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.20.200.
Acceptance of grants.

The department may accept on behalf of the state and may deposit separate and apart from public money and funds, a grant from the federal government, or gift or contribution from any source made to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the purposes of AS

18.20.140

—

18.20.220

.
Federal funds received and not expended for these purposes shall be repaid to the United States.

History.

(§ 9 ch 87 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.20.210.
Definitions.

In AS

18.20.140

—

18.20.220

,

“community mental health center” means a facility providing services for the prevention or diagnosis of mental illness, or care and treatment of mentally ill patients, or rehabilitation of mentally ill persons, which services are provided principally for persons residing in a particular community or communities in or near which the facility is situated;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” means a facility specially designed for the diagnosis, treatment, education, training, or custodial care of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, including facilities for training specialists and sheltered workshops for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, but only if the workshops are part of facilities that provide or will provide comprehensive services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

“federal act” means Title VI of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 291 et seq.) concerning hospitals and medical facilities and the Mental Retardation Facilities and Community Mental Health Centers Construction Act of 1963 (P.L. 88-164) concerning facilities for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and community mental health centers, both as now or hereafter amended;

“hospital” includes a public health center and general, tuberculosis, mental, chronic disease, and other type of hospital, and related facilities, including laboratory, outpatient department, nurses’ homes, and training facilities, and central services facilities operated in connection with a hospital, but does not include a hospital furnishing primarily domiciliary care;

“medical facilities” means diagnostic and treatment centers, rehabilitation facilities, and nursing homes, as those terms are defined in the federal act, and other medical facilities for which federal aid may be authorized under the federal act;

“nonprofit facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” and “nonprofit community mental health center” mean, respectively, a facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and a community mental health center that is owned and operated by one or more nonprofit corporations or associations no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual; and the term “nonprofit private agency or organization” means an agency or organization that is such a corporation or association or that is owned and operated by one or more of such corporations or associations;

“nonprofit hospital” and “nonprofit medical facility” mean a hospital or medical facility owned and operated by a nonprofit corporation or association, no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the benefit of a private shareholder or individual;

“public health center” means a publicly owned facility providing public health services, including related facilities such as laboratory, clinic, and administrative offices operated in connection with the public health center;

“surgeon general” means the Surgeon General of the Public Health Service or any other federal agency designated to administer the federal act.

History.

(§ 3 ch 87 SLA 1955; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 63 SLA 1964; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A nursing home is considered a hospital for the purpose of the licensing provision. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Sec. 18.20.220.
Short title.

AS

18.20.140

—

18.20.220

may be cited as the Alaska Hospital and Medical Facilities Survey and Construction Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1955)

Secs. 18.20.230 — 18.20.260.
Leaving general hospital without arranging for payment; posting of law required; receipt of services without intent to pay a misdemeanor; definition. [Repealed, § 45 ch 57 SLA 2005.]